Missouri, session 2026, HB1720.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 67.2727, to read as follows:
67.2727. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Governing body", the governing body of a political subdivision;
(2) "Meeting", any meeting of a governing body;
(3) "Political subdivision", any county, city, town, or village.
2. Before July 1, 2027, each governing body shall adopt a meeting speaker policy
to ensure that the requirements listed in this subsection are followed at each meeting of
the governing body:
(1) Each governing body shall designate a time for public comment at the
beginning of each regular public meeting. Such public comment period shall be
available to residents, businesses, and taxpayers of the political subdivision and shall be
subject to reasonable rules requiring decorum and civility in the meeting space;
(2) No governing body shall restrict the category or content of remarks during
such public comment period;
(3) A governing body may set a time limit on any individual who desires to speak
at a meeting. Each such time limit shall designate not less than three minutes per
speaker. The governing body may limit the public comment period to one hour of actual
testimony or twenty speakers, whichever is less based on the number of minutes
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1720 2
designated per speaker. If the time designated for the public comment period expires
and additional speakers were not afforded the time to speak, such additional speakers
shall have the opportunity to speak at the public comment period of the next regular
public meeting and the governing body shall provide an alternate method of
communicating such additional speakers' concerns to the governing body;
(4) Each governing body may request identifying information of each individual
desiring to speak, but shall not require any information other than the name and
address of the individual as a condition of speaking;
(5) No governing body shall ban an individual from attending or remove an
individual from participating in a meeting unless such individual is banned or removed
because such individual commits the offense of peace disturbance as provided in section
574.010, has previously been removed from a meeting and issued a summons for the
offense of peace disturbance under section 574.010, or is prohibited from being on
property of the political subdivision under state law; and
(6) Each governing body shall provide a method for an individual who is unable
to attend the public comment period of a meeting to submit a written statement. Any
such written statement submitted before the beginning of the meeting shall be provided
to the governing body and made available to all individuals attending such meeting and
to the public upon request unless such written statement violates the policies or rules
established for the public comment period.
3. If it is necessary to hold a meeting on less than twenty-four hours' notice, or if
the meeting will be conducted exclusively electronically, or at a time that is not
reasonably convenient to the public, the nature of the good cause justifying that
departure from the normal requirements shall be stated in the minutes. Meetings held
in person and not otherwise subject to being closed under section 610.021 shall be
conducted in a manner that allows physical in-person public attendance.
✔